Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB8.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.645 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly recognizes that educating the Commonwealth's children
with essential knowledge and capacities is the critical goal of public education[
involves shared responsibilities]. The education of the children of the
Commonwealth requires the shared efforts of state and local government, [local
]communities, parents, students, teachers, and other school employees[ must work
together to create an efficient public school system]. These parties need to work
cooperatively to provide quality educational services to all of the
Commonwealth's children. The public schools of the Commonwealth encompass
dynamic models and various delivery systems, but each is tasked with ensuring
every student acquires the knowledge and fundamental proficiencies, especially
in the core academic content areas, to become informed and productive citizens.[
Parents and students must assist schools with efforts to assure student attendance,
preparation for school, and involvement in learning. The cooperation of all involved
is necessary to assure that desired outcomes are achieved.]
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a system of public education
which shall allow and assist all students to acquire the following capacities:
(a)[(1)] Communication skills necessary to function in a complex and changing
civilization;
(b)[(2)] Knowledge to make economic, social, and political choices;
(c) [(3)] Core values and qualities of good character to make moral and ethical
decisions throughout his or her life;
(d) [(4)] Understanding of governmental processes as they affect the community,
the state, and the nation;
(e) [(5)] Sufficient self-knowledge and knowledge of his or her mental and
Page 1 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
physical wellness;
(f) [(6)] Sufficient grounding in the arts to enable each student to appreciate his
or her cultural and historical heritage;
(g) [(7)] Sufficient preparation to choose and pursue his or her life's work
intelligently; and
(h) [(8)] Skills to enable him or her to compete favorably with students in other
states.
(3) (a) It is the additional and specific intent of the General Assembly to create an
efficient system of common schools that creates a solid educational
foundation upon which the Commonwealth's children can continue to build
and grow. To achieve this goal, the General Assembly seeks to create a
system of education in the lower grades based upon the following
principles:
1. The primary focus of public education during kindergarten through
grade five (5) shall be in the development of foundational knowledge
and capacities in the core academic content areas of reading and
language arts, mathematics, natural sciences, and social studies; and
2. The secondary focus of public education during kindergarten through
grade five (5) shall be in the enrichment areas of:
a. Visual, auditory, and tactile arts; and
b. Physical education, fitness, and an understanding of personal
health.
(b) By focusing primarily on the core academic content areas and secondarily
on the enrichment of students during this critical time period, public
education in the lower grades will provide students with the basic knowledge
and capacities necessary for future education and development.
(4) As used in this section and Section 2 of this Act:
Page 2 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
(a) "Core academic content area" or "core academic content areas" means a
course or program offered in an elementary or secondary school in the
subject area of reading and language arts, mathematics, natural sciences,
or social studies; and
(b) "Lower grades" means kindergarten through grade five (5).
Section 2. KRS 156.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall have the management and control of the
common schools and all programs operated in these schools, including
interscholastic athletics, the Kentucky School for the Deaf, the Kentucky School for
the Blind, and community education programs and services.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education may designate an organization or agency to
manage interscholastic athletics in the common schools, provided that the rules,
regulations, and bylaws of any organization or agency so designated shall be
approved by the board, and provided further that any administrative hearing
conducted by the designated managing organization or agency shall be conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(a) The state board or its designated agency shall ensure[assure] through
promulgation of administrative regulations that if a secondary school sponsors
or intends to sponsor an athletic activity or sport that is similar to a sport for
which National Collegiate Athletic Association members offer an athletic
scholarship, the school shall sponsor the athletic activity or sport for which a
scholarship is offered. The administrative regulations shall specify which
athletic activities are similar to sports for which National Collegiate Athletic
Association members offer scholarships.
(b) Beginning with the 2003-2004 school year, the state board shall require any
agency or organization designated by the state board to manage interscholastic
athletics to adopt bylaws that establish as members of the agency's or
Page 3 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
organization's board of control one (1) representative of nonpublic member
schools who is elected by the nonpublic school members of the agency or
organization from regions one (1) through eight (8) and one (1) representative
of nonpublic member schools who is elected by the nonpublic member
schools of the agency or organization from regions nine (9) through sixteen
(16). The nonpublic school representatives on the board of control shall not be
from classification A1 or D1 schools. Following initial election of these
nonpublic school representatives to the agency's or organization's board of
control, terms of the nonpublic school representatives shall be staggered so
that only one (1) nonpublic school member is elected in each even-numbered
year.
(c) The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics shall not promulgate rules, administrative regulations,
or by laws that prohibit pupils in grades seven (7) to eight (8) from
participating in any high school sports except for high school varsity soccer
and football, or from participating on more than one (1) school-sponsored
team at the same time in the same sport. The Kentucky Board of Education, or
an agency designated by the board to manage interscholastic athletics, may
promulgate administrative regulations restricting, limiting, or prohibiting
participation in high school varsity soccer and football for students who have
not successfully completed the eighth grade.
(d) 1. The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics shall allow a member school's team or students
to play against students of a nonmember at-home private school, or a
team of students from nonmember at-home private schools, if the
nonmember at-home private schools and students comply with this
subsection.
Page 4 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
2. A nonmember at-home private school's team and students shall comply
with the rules for student-athletes, including rules concerning:
a. Age;
b. School semesters;
c. Scholarships;
d. Physical exams;
e. Foreign student eligibility; and
f. Amateurs.
3. A coach of a nonmember at-home private school's team shall comply
with the rules concerning certification of member school coaches as
required by the state board or any agency designated by the state board
to manage interscholastic athletics.
4. This subsection shall not allow a nonmember at-home private school's
team to participate in a sanctioned:
a. Conference;
b. Conference tournament;
c. District tournament;
d. Regional tournament; or
e. State tournament or event.
5. This subsection does not allow eligibility for a recognition, award, or
championship sponsored by the state board or any agency designated by
the state board to manage interscholastic athletics.
6. A nonmember at-home private school's team or students may participate
in interscholastic athletics permitted, offered, or sponsored by the state
board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics.
(e) Every local board of education shall require an annual medical examination
Page 5 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
performed and signed by a physician, physician assistant, advanced practice
registered nurse, or chiropractor, if performed within the professional's scope
of practice, for each student seeking eligibility to participate in any school
athletic activity or sport. The Kentucky Board of Education or any
organization or agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic
athletics shall not promulgate administrative regulations or adopt any policies
or bylaws that are contrary to the provisions of this paragraph.
(f) Any student who turns nineteen (19) years of age prior to August 1 shall not
be eligible for high school athletics in Kentucky. Any student who turns
nineteen (19) years of age on or after August 1 shall remain eligible for that
school year only. An exception to the provisions of this paragraph shall be
made, and the student shall be eligible for high school athletics in Kentucky if
the student:
1. Qualified for exceptional children services and had an individual
education program developed by an admissions and release committee
(ARC) while the student was enrolled in the primary school program;
2. Was retained in the primary school program because of an ARC
committee recommendation; and
3. Has not completed four (4) consecutive years or eight (8) consecutive
semesters of eligibility following initial promotion from grade eight (8)
to grade nine (9).
(g) The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics shall promulgate administrative regulations or bylaws
that provide that:
1. A member school shall designate all athletic teams, activities, and sports
for students in grades six (6) through twelve (12) as one (1) of the
following categories:
Page 6 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
a. "Boys";
b. "Coed"; or
c. "Girls";
2. The sex of a student for the purpose of determining eligibility to
participate in an athletic activity or sport shall be determined by:
a. A student's biological sex as indicated on the student's original,
unedited birth certificate issued at the time of birth; or
b. An affidavit signed and sworn to by the physician, physician
assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or chiropractor that
conducted the annual medical examination required by paragraph
(e) of this subsection under penalty of perjury establishing the
student's biological sex at the time of birth;
3. a. An athletic activity or sport designated as "girls" for students in
grades six (6) through twelve (12) shall not be open to members of
the male sex.
b. Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the eligibility
of any student to participate in an athletic activity or sport
designated as "boys" or "coed"; and
4. Neither the state board, any agency designated by the state board to
manage interscholastic athletics, any school district, nor any member
school shall entertain a complaint, open an investigation, or take any
other adverse action against a school for maintaining separate
interscholastic or intramural athletic teams, activities, or sports for
students of the female sex.
(h) 1. The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics shall promulgate administrative regulations that
permit a school district to employ or assign nonteaching or noncertified
Page 7 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
personnel or personnel without postsecondary education credit hours to
serve in a coaching position. The administrative regulations shall give
preference to the hiring or assignment of certified personnel in coaching
positions.
2. A person employed in a coaching position shall be a high school
graduate and at least twenty-one (21) years of age and shall submit to a
criminal background check in accordance with KRS 160.380.
3. The administrative regulations shall specify post-hire requirements for
persons employed in coaching positions.
4. The regulations shall permit a predetermined number of hours of
professional development training approved by the state board or its
designated agency to be used in lieu of postsecondary education credit
hour requirements.
5. A local school board may specify post-hire requirements for personnel
employed in coaching positions in addition to those specified in
subparagraph 3. of this paragraph.
(i) Unless permitted to be eligible for varsity athletics by any transfer rule,
policy, or administrative regulation promulgated by the state board or any
agency designated by the state board to manage interscholastic athletics, any
student who transfers enrollment from a district of residence to a nonresident
district under KRS 157.350(4)(b) after enrolling in grade nine (9) and
participating in a varsity sport shall be ineligible to participate in
interscholastic athletics for one (1) calendar year from the date of the transfer.
The state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics may adopt rules, policies, and bylaws and promulgate
administrative regulations necessary to carry out this paragraph.
(j) No member school shall grant a student-athlete the right to use the member
Page 8 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
school's intellectual property, such as trademarks, school uniforms, and
copyrights, in the student's earning of compensation through name, image,
and likeness activities. No student-athlete shall use such intellectual property
in earning compensation through name, image, and likeness activities. The
state board or any agency designated by the state board to manage
interscholastic athletics shall promulgate administrative regulations to govern
and enforce this paragraph.
(3) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education is hereby authorized to lease from the State
Property and Buildings Commission or others, whether public or private, any
lands, buildings, structures, installations, and facilities suitable for use in
establishing and furthering television and related facilities as an aid or
supplement to classroom instruction throughout the Commonwealth and for
incidental use in any other proper public functions. The lease may be for any
initial term commencing with the date of the lease and ending with the next
ensuing June 30, which is the close of the then-current fiscal biennium of the
Commonwealth, with exclusive options in favor of the board to renew the
same for successive ensuing bienniums, July 1 in each even year to June 30 in
the next ensuing even year; and the rentals may be fixed at the sums in each
biennium, if renewed, sufficient to enable the State Property and Buildings
Commission to pay therefrom the maturing principal of and interest on, and
provide reserves for, any revenue bonds which the State Property and
Buildings Commission may determine to be necessary and sufficient, in
agreement with the board, to provide the cost of acquiring the television and
related facilities with appurtenances and costs as may be incident to the
issuance of the bonds.
(b) Each option of the Kentucky Board of Education to renew the lease for a
succeeding biennial term may be exercised at any time after the adjournment
Page 9 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
of the session of the General Assembly at which appropriations shall have
been made for the operation of the state government for such succeeding
biennial term, by notifying the State Property and Buildings Commission in
writing, signed by the commissioner of education[chief state school officer],
and delivered to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as a
member of the commission. The option shall be deemed automatically
exercised, and the lease automatically renewed for the succeeding biennium,
effective on the first day thereof, unless a written notice of the board's election
not to renew shall have been delivered in the office of the secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet before the close of business on the last
working day in April immediately preceding the beginning of the succeeding
biennium.
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall not itself operate leased television
facilities, or undertake the preparation of the educational presentations or
films to be transmitted thereby, but may enter into one (1) or more contracts
to provide therefor, with any public agency and instrumentality of the
Commonwealth having, or able to provide, a staff with proper technical
qualifications, upon which agency and instrumentality the board, through the
commissioner of education[chief state school officer] and the Department of
Education, is represented in such manner as to coordinate matters of
curriculum with the curricula prescribed for the public schools of the
Commonwealth. Any contract for the operation of the leased television or
related facilities may permit limited and special uses of the television or
related facilities for other programs in the public interest, subject to the
reasonable terms and conditions as the board and the operating agency and
instrumentality may agree upon; but any contract shall affirmatively forbid the
use of the television or related facilities, at any time or in any manner, in the
Page 10 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
dissemination of political propaganda or in furtherance of the interest of any
political party or candidate for public office, or for commercial advertising.
No lease between the board and the State Property and Buildings Commission
shall bind the board to pay rentals for more than one (1) fiscal biennium at a
time, subject to the aforesaid renewal options. The board may receive and
may apply to rental payments under any lease and to the cost of providing for
the operation of the television or related facilities not only appropriations
which may be made to it from state funds, from time to time, but also
contributions, gifts, matching funds, devises, and bequests from any source,
whether federal or state, and whether public or private, so long as the same are
not conditioned upon any improper use of the television or related facilities in
a manner inconsistent with the provisions of this subsection.
(4) The state board may, on the recommendation and with the advice of the
commissioner of education[chief state school officer], prescribe, print, publish, and
distribute at public expense such administrative regulations, courses of study,
curriculums, bulletins, programs, outlines, reports, and placards as each deems
necessary for the efficient management, control, and operation of the schools and
programs under its jurisdiction. All administrative regulations published or
distributed by the board shall be enclosed in a booklet or binder on which the words
"informational copy" shall be clearly stamped or printed.
(5) Upon the recommendation of the commissioner of education[chief state school
officer] or his or her designee, the state board shall establish policy or act on all
matters relating to programs, services, publications, capital construction and facility
renovation, equipment, litigation, contracts, budgets, and all other matters which are
the administrative responsibility of the Department of Education.
(6) The state board shall be responsible for:
(a) Adopting or rejecting the state academic standards as recommended by the
Page 11 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council pursuant to
Section 24 of this Act;
(b) Adopting or rejecting instructional materials collections as recommended by
the State Instructional Materials Council pursuant to Section 5 of this Act
and in accordance with the following:
1. By December 31, 2025, the state board shall adopt no more than three
(3) instructional materials collections for each of the core academic
content areas in each grade level in the lower grades as recommended
by the State Instructional Materials Council;
2. By December 31, 2026, the state board shall adopt no more than three
(3) instructional materials collections for each of the core academic
content areas in each grade level in grades six (6) through grade eight
(8) as recommended by the State Instructional Materials Council; and
3. By December 31, 2027, the state board shall adopt no more than three
(3) instructional materials collections for each course, program, or
credit required or available to satisfy a nonelective credit within the
minimum high school graduation requirements; and
(c) Ensuring alignment and continuity by establishing procedures and a
timeline for the development of recommendations and adoption of state
academic standards and instructional materials collections that create
alignment, continuity, and a cohesive academic plan for students in all
grades and in all districts across the Commonwealth consistent with the
goals and core competencies identified in Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 156 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education, in supporting school district adoption of
instructional materials and implementation of curriculum, shall develop, for each
Page 12 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
instructional materials collection adopted by the Kentucky Board of Education
pursuant to Section 2 of this Act, a guide for educators that details:
(a) The state academic standards addressed by the instructional materials;
(b) How the instructional materials are connected to specific learning targets
that are aligned to those state academic standards;
(c) Questions students should be able to answer, skills students should be able
to demonstrate, and products students should be able to produce in
connection with the instructional materials, achieving learning targets, and
meeting the state academic standard; and
(d) A curriculum guide for using the instructional materials with sample
instructional plans that provide a realistic instructional schedule for using
the materials over the school year.
(2) The guides shall be made available at no cost to all public school teachers and
administrators.
(3) The department shall consult with the School Curriculum, Assessment, and
Accountability Council in the development of the guides required under this
section.
Section 4. KRS 156.395 is amended to read as follows:
For purposes of KRS 156.400 to 156.476, unless the context requires otherwise:[,]
(1) "Instructional materials" means tools used to assist in student learning, as defined in
administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education; and
(2) "Instructional materials collection" means a system of interrelated instructional
materials offered by a publisher or developer to support learning of a specific
content area or grade level.
Section 5. KRS 156.405 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission]
is to be the sole recommending party to the Kentucky Board of Education of
Page 13 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
a[provide a recommended] list of current and high quality [textbooks and
]instructional materials [to local school districts ]that complement the educational
program in Kentucky schools; to provide a consumer guide to schools to aid with
the selection of materials; and to provide for public participation in the evaluation
process. The State Instructional Materials Council shall be attached to the
Kentucky Department of Education for administrative and support purposes.
(2) The State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission] shall consist of
the commissioner of education[chief state school officer] and ten (10) appointive
members. The ten (10) members shall be appointed by the Kentucky Board of
Education upon the recommendation of the commissioner of education[chief state
school officer] for terms of four (4) years with two (2) appointments each year,
except that every fourth year there shall be four (4) appointments. No member shall
be eligible to serve more than two (2) full terms consecutively. All vacancies that
occur on the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission] shall be
filled in like manner for the remainder of the unexpired terms. The Department of
Education and the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission]
shall receive assistance in the instructional materials[textbook] evaluation process
from professionals and lay citizens who will be referred to in this chapter as the
["textbook ]reviewers.["]
(3) The State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission] shall:
(a) Select and direct the activities of the [textbook ]reviewers who develop
selection criteria and review instructional materials[textbooks and
programs];
(b) Develop selection criteria and evaluation forms with the help of the [textbook
]reviewers and Kentucky Department of Education staff to be used in the state
level review process;
(c) Approve the evaluative criteria and forms used by the council[commission]
Page 14 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
and [textbook ]reviewers;
(d) Review the [textbook ]reviewers' evaluations, and instructional
materials[textbooks or programs] as it deems necessary, in order to select
from them a [recommended ]list of high quality materials for
recommendation to the state board;
(e) Provide notice of and the opportunity for public inspection of instructional
materials collections[textbooks and programs] offered for adoption and use in
the public schools;
(f) Conduct a public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment
concerning instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs]
under consideration;
(g) Select and[,] recommend[, and publish] a list of high quality instructional
materials collections for adoption or rejection by the Kentucky Board of
Education pursuant to Section 2 of this Act[textbooks and programs]; and
(h) Publish the list of instructional materials collections approved by the
Kentucky Board of Education, as well as a consumer guide and distribute
these[it] to Kentucky public schools.
(4) The [textbook ]reviewers shall be comprised of twelve (12) individuals for the area
or areas being considered for adoption. The [textbook ]reviewers shall be approved
by the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission] based on the
recommendation of the commissioner of education[chief state school officer].
(5) The [textbook ]reviewers shall:
(a) Develop and submit to the council[commission] subject specific evaluative
criteria to be used in reviewing instructional materials[textbooks and
programs];
(b) Review instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs] to
determine those of high quality, using evaluative criteria and forms approved
Page 15 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
by the council[commission];
(c) Submit to the council[commission] reviews and evaluative forms regarding
reviewed instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs];
(d) Attend meetings and training sessions as requested by the
council[commission] and the Department of Education; and
(e) Ensure that instructional materials[textbooks] are free from factual error.
(6) (a) 1. Eight (8) of the appointive members of the State Instructional
Materials Council[Textbook Commission] shall have had not less than
five (5) years teaching or supervising experience in the public schools of
Kentucky and shall have had at the time of their appointment at least
four (4) years of college training in a recognized institution of higher
education.
2. Five (5) members of the council[commission] shall be classroom
teachers actively employed in the public schools of Kentucky as
teachers in subject field or fields for which the council[commission]
will select books.
3. Two (2) members shall be principals, supervisors, or superintendents of
public schools or public school systems.
4. One (1) member shall be a member of the faculty of a public institution
of higher education engaged in teacher preparation.
5. Two (2) members shall be lay citizens, one (1) of whom shall have a
child enrolled in a public school at the time of appointment.
(b) In recommending the members of the State Instructional Materials
Council[Textbook Commission] the commissioner of education[chief state
school officer] shall give due regard to representation from rural and urban
areas and from the elementary, middle, and high school levels when the
educational levels are included in the subject field or fields for which
Page 16 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
adoptions are to be made.
(7) [Textbook ]Reviewers shall have the following qualifications: Six (6) of the
textbook reviewers shall be instructional supervisors and classroom teachers in
various and appropriate grade levels primary through grade twelve (12), with
experience and training in the subject areas to be reviewed. One (1) reviewer shall
have expertise and training in learning theory as applied to the classroom situation.
One (1) reviewer shall be a current or former university faculty member with
expertise in the content area of the textbooks to be reviewed. One (1) reviewer shall
have experience and training in development of instructional materials[readability
and formatting of textbooks]. Three (3) reviewers shall be parents, two (2) of whom
shall have a child currently enrolled in public schools in Kentucky.
(8) Members of the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission]
shall receive [fifty ($50) dollars per day and ]reimbursement for their actual
expenses while attending council[commission] meetings. [Textbook ]Reviewers
shall receive remuneration based on the amount of textbooks and programs to be
reviewed and criteria to be developed as determined by the commissioner of
education[chief state school officer]. [Textbook reviewers shall be paid one
hundred dollars ($100) per day, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000)
annually. Textbook ]Reviewers shall also receive reimbursement for actual
expenses while attending reviewer or council[commission] meetings.
(9) The meetings of the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission]
shall be open to the public and shall be held at least once every quarter and notice
of such meeting shall be given in accordance with KRS 424.110 to 424.210.
(10) Not later than May 1 each year the commissioner of education[chief state school
officer] shall call the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission]
into session. The members of the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook
Commission] shall elect one (1) of its voting members as chair[chairman] and shall
Page 17 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
adopt administrative regulations for the procedure of the council[commission]. The
commissioner of education[chief state school officer] shall be the secretary of the
council[commission].
Section 6. KRS 156.415 is amended to read as follows:
Before instructional materials collections approved[textbooks and programs offered] for
adoption and use in public schools of Kentucky may be lawfully recommended [and
listed ]by the State Instructional Materials Council, approval by the Kentucky Board of
Education,[Textbook Commission] or purchased by any board of education, the person,
firm, or corporation offering the materials for adoption and use shall file with the
commissioner of education[chief state school officer]:
(1) Copies of all textbooks, materials, and programs that the person, firm, or
corporation desires to offer for adoption and use, with a sworn statement of the list
price and the lowest wholesale price at which each of the titles is sold in any
adopting unit;
(2) A statement that all the titles offered for sale, adoption, and use, do comply with the
standards and specifications for instructional materials[textbooks] designated by
the commissioner of education[chief state school officer] as regards paper, binding,
printing, illustrations, subject matter, technological requirements, and other items
included in the standards and specifications;
(3) Copies of any revision or special editions of the instructional materials[textbooks]
and programs filed, with a statement describing in detail each point of difference
from the regular edition filed, and the list price and the lowest wholesale price at
which the revision or special edition is sold anywhere in the United States;
(4) A fee of five dollars ($5) for each instructional materials collection[book] filed
except when a series of instructional materials collections[books] is filed, in which
case the fee shall be five dollars ($5) for the first collection[book] and one dollar
($1) for each additional collection[book] in the series. The fee provided by this
Page 18 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
subsection shall be paid at each and every adoption period;
(5) A bond running to the Commonwealth of Kentucky, executed by a surety company
authorized to do business in this state, in a sum not less than two thousand dollars
($2,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), to be determined by the
commissioner of education[chief state school officer]; and
(6) An affidavit certifying any instructional materials collections[textbook] the
publisher or developer[manufacturer] offers in the state to be free of factual error at
the time[ the publisher or manufacturer executes] a contract is executed.
Section 7. KRS 156.433 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the commissioner of
education[chief state school officer], shall promulgate an administrative regulation
identifying instructional materials eligible for purchase[ with state textbook funds].
The regulation shall identify instructional materials which are subject to review
before being added to the eligible materials list[recommended] for use, establish a
procedure for the review, and a process for adding an instructional material to the
eligible materials[recommended] list.[ The Department of Education may pay
instructional materials reviewers an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars
($1,000) annually per reviewer for their services using funds from the appropriation
for state textbooks.]
(2) The Department of Education shall compile the eligible materials into[establish] a
list approved by the Kentucky Board of Education and[of recommended
instructional materials] from which[for the use of] school personnel shall select.
(3) School districts shall select from the approved instructional materials list, where
available, for implementation in the appropriate course, program, or grade level
within each school district.
Section 8. KRS 156.474 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the commissioner
Page 19 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
of education[chief state school officer], shall have the authority to prescribe the
conditions whereby a school district may make multiple instructional materials
collections[textbook] adoptions for the different school subjects by grades.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the commissioner
of education[chief state school officer], shall have the authority to prescribe the
administrative regulations to govern the purchase of the multiple-adopted
instructional materials collections[textbooks] for the school district.[ The chief
state school officer, subject to the approval of the Kentucky Board of Education,
may purchase the textbooks from the publishers whose books have been adopted by
the school district for grades kindergarten through twelve (12) and distribute them
without cost to the pupils attending the public schools in the school district.]
Section 9. KRS 156.407 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner of education[chief state school officer] shall, not later than
February 1 of each year in which an adoption is to be made, solicit applications for
filling twelve (12) positions for [textbook ]reviewers.
(2) Solicitation shall be statewide for all appointments and include specifications which
ensure candidates have professional expertise in the subject areas to be reviewed if
appropriate for the appointment.
(3) The State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission], at its first
yearly meeting, shall select [textbook ]reviewers based on a list of qualified
applicants prepared by the commissioner of education[chief state school officer]
and giving consideration to the recommendations as specified in KRS 156.405.
(4) The Department of Education's curriculum and instruction specialists shall serve as
staff to the commission and reviewers. The staff shall:
(a) Orient and train the council[commission] and reviewers regarding
departmental policy and review procedures;
(b) Make available existing standards and criteria for [textbook ]evaluation; and
Page 20 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
(c) Provide supplies and sample instructional materials collections[textbooks]
for the review process.
(5) The [textbook ]reviewers shall develop subject specific criteria for instructional
materials collections[textbook] review and evaluation in the following[ textbook]
areas:
(a) Subject content, including its relationship to the academic
standards[expectations];
(b) Audience;
(c) Format;
(d) Readability and use;
(e) Accuracy; and
(f) Associated[Ancillary] materials and resources.
(6) On or before July 15, the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook
Commission] shall develop general criteria, review and approve subject specific
criteria, and provide the standard criteria and evaluation forms to be used by the
council[commission] and [textbook ]reviewers.
(7) Based upon approval of the standard criteria and evaluation forms, the [textbook
]reviewers shall review instructional materials collections[textbooks and
programs]. The council[committee] shall submit evaluation forms for each
instructional materials collection[textbook or program] reviewed in each of the
five (5) areas, set forth in subsection (5) of this section, with comments related to
strengths and weaknesses in each area.
(8) The State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission] shall review the
work of the [textbook ]reviewers and based on this review and any of its own
reviews of instructional materials collections[textbooks or programs], establish a
state multiple list of instructional materials collections for recommendation to the
state board[recommended textbooks and programs]. The list of
Page 21 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
collections[recommended textbooks and programs] shall be free of factual error.
Copies of all evaluation forms submitted by the [textbook ]reviewers shall be made
available to council[commission] members and maintained on file within the
Department of Education for the length of the adoption cycle[cycle length of the
books]. For those materials placed on the state multiple list of approved
collections[recommended textbooks and programs], the Department of Education
shall publish a consumer guide that includes summary results of the evaluations and
any factual error identified in the instructional materials[textbooks], and shall
distribute it to all public schools in the state.
Section 10. KRS 156.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner of education[chief state school officer] shall prepare minimum
[manufacturing ]standards, delineate content specifications, in accordance with the
state academic standards and curriculum requirements of the program of studies
for Kentucky schools: grades K-12, and formulate other criteria for use in the
evaluation of instructional materials[textbooks and programs] in Kentucky.
Criteria shall require that all materials be suitable for use with a diverse population
and be free of social, ethnic, racial, religious, age, gender, and geographic bias.
(2) It shall be the duty of the commissioner of education[chief state school officer] to
prepare all necessary forms for use in the evaluation of instructional
materials[textbooks and programs], such as advertising for [textbook ]bids; forms
for bids, bonds, and contracts; and other forms.
(3) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the commissioner
of education[chief state school officer], shall have authority to promulgate
administrative regulations[prescribe]:
(a) [Administrative regulations ]Pertaining to all instructional
materials[textbook] samples for use on the state and local levels; and
(b) [Shall have authority to promulgate administrative regulations ]Relating to the
Page 22 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
agents and representatives of instructional materials collections publishers
or developers[textbooks and programs], as to the methods and procedures for
use in adoptions on the state and local levels.
(4) The commissioner of education[chief state school officer], on or before May 1
prior to any adoption year, shall properly advertise the subjects for which
instructional materials[textbook] adoptions will be made and notify the different
publishers and developers[ of the textbooks]. The publishers and developers, on or
before July 15, of any adoption year, shall file with the commissioner of
education[chief state school officer] instructional materials collections[textbook]
samples, filing fees, [textbook ]bids and bonds, and other specified information
relative to the instructional materials collections[books] that they desire to offer
for adoption.
(5) The commissioner of education[chief state school officer] shall:
(a) Review the bid information submitted by the publishers and developers;
(b) Verify that the bid complies with the specifications; and
(c) Prepare a list of instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs],
for consideration by the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook
Commission] indicating those in compliance with the standards and
specifications and those not in compliance, detailing areas of noncompliance.
Section 11. KRS 156.420 is amended to read as follows:
The bond required by the person, firm, or corporation offering instructional
materials[the books] for adoption shall be so conditioned that:
(1) The person, firm, or corporation will furnish any of the instructional
materials[books] listed in the statement filed for the period of adoption from the
date of the bond to any school district in Kentucky, or to any dealer appointed by
the district, at the lowest wholesale price contained in the statement, f.o.b. the
publisher's nearest shipping point;
Page 23 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
(2) The person, firm, or corporation shall not bid and enter into a contract for an
adoption period with the Commonwealth of Kentucky for instructional
materials[books] at a higher wholesale price than is being bid for the same adoption
period elsewhere in the United States.
(3) The person, firm, or corporation will automatically reduce such prices in Kentucky
whenever reductions are made anywhere in the United States, so that no
instructional material[book] shall at any time be sold in Kentucky at a higher
wholesale price than is received for that instructional material[book] elsewhere in
the United States;
(4) If the person, firm, or corporation prepared an abridged or special edition of any
book that has been listed and sells it elsewhere at a lower wholesale price than the
wholesale price set out in the filed statement, the person will file a copy of the
special edition with the price of the special edition in a supplemental statement with
the commissioner of education[chief state school officer];
(5) All instructional materials[books] sold in Kentucky will be identical with the
specimens[specimen books] filed with the commissioner of education[chief state
school officer] as regards size, paper, binding, print, illustrations, subject matter,
technological specifications, and other particulars which may affect the value of
the instructional materials[books];
(6) The person, firm, or corporation shall not enter into any agreement, understanding,
or combination to control the price of instructional materials[textbooks] or to
restrict competition in their sale in Kentucky.
Section 12. KRS 156.425 is amended to read as follows:
The form of the sworn statement and bond required shall be prescribed by the
commissioner of education[chief state school officer]. The bond shall be in force for the
adoption period. The person, firm, or corporation may at any time while the bond is in
force file a supplemental statement covering additional instructional materials[books] or
Page 24 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
special editions of instructional materials[books] previously filed. The supplemental
statement shall expire at the date of expiration of the original statement and bond. Prior to
the expiration of any statement and bond the person may file a new statement and bond
for a further period of adoption, and if he or she fails to file a new statement and bond his
right to offer instructional materials[textbooks] for adoption and use in the public
schools of Kentucky shall expire on the date of expiration of the former bond.
Section 13. KRS 156.435 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission] shall, not
later than September 20 of any year in which an adoption is to be made,
select[,] and recommend to the Kentucky Board of Education for adoption,
[and publish ]a list of instructional materials collections[books or programs]
in each subject and grade, taking into account the needs of the various types
of students.
(b) Within fourteen (14) days of the state board approving a list of instructional
materials collections in a subject or grade, the State Instructional Materials
Council and the Kentucky Department of Education shall publish the
approved list available for adoption by local school districts.
(2) The State Instructional Materials Council and the state board[Textbook
Commission] shall have the authority to reject any instructional material[book]
which:
(a) Contains subversive material or information that is offered for listing or
adoption. If the council[commission] finds on the multiple list any
instructional material[book] which contains subversive material or
information, provided the publisher or developer[of the book] has been given
written notice by the secretary of the council[commission] not less than thirty
(30) days prior to the meeting, the council[textbook commission] shall have
authority to remove the material[book] from the state multiple list;
Page 25 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
(b) Is in noncompliance with standards and specifications set forth in KRS
156.410; or
(c) Is not of high quality in terms of the content provided, the audience addressed,
the format used, technological specifications, the readability and usability of
material or the ancillary materials provided the teacher and students.
(3) The State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission] shall have the
authority to solicit additions for the state list when the list does not contain [books
or ]materials for subjects added to the state courses of study.
(4) The commissioner of education[chief state school officer] shall make and execute
contracts for the approved instructional materials collections[recommended
textbooks and programs] with the publishers or developers on or before May 1
following the establishment of the state multiple list of materials approved for
selection by districts as[recommended titles] selected by the council and approved
by the state board[commission]. Except as described in KRS 156.400, all contracts
shall run for six (6) years.
(5) The commissioner of education[chief state school officer] shall prepare a multiple
list of approved instructional materials collections[recommended textbooks or
programs] and publish the list along with a consumer guide and distribute the
documents to the superintendents of each county and independent school district in
Kentucky on or before November 15 following[of] each amendment to the
approved list of instructional materials collections[adoption year].
(6) Except as otherwise provided or where an approved list has not been adopted,
school districts shall only be permitted to utilize instructional materials
collections from the approved list.
Section 14. KRS 156.437 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the commissioner of
education[chief state school officer], shall have the authority to prescribe administrative
Page 26 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
regulations for the approved[recommended] listing by the State Instructional Materials
Council[Textbook Commission], adoption by local adoption units, and the purchase of
subject programs for the pupils in the public schools.
Section 15. KRS 156.438 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to
establish procedures for reviewing and resolving claims of factual errors found in
instructional materials[textbooks] after adoption by the state board upon the
recommendation of the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook
Commission].
(2) The administrative regulations shall include:
(a) A process for an individual who believes that a factual error or errors have
been found to file notice of his or her findings;
(b) A methodology for validating the accuracy of a claim of factual error;
(c) The development of conditions to include in publishers' or developers'
contracts specifying protocols for correcting errors which take into account
the following:
1. The extensiveness of the errors found;
2. The remaining time left until the next instructional materials[textbook]
adoption cycle at the time the claim is determined to be valid;
3. Conditions that would necessitate replacement of printed instructional
material[a book] in its entirety or correction of a digital instructional
material; and
4. Conditions that could be addressed through the insertion of corrections
in a printed instructional material[textbooks] without replacement;
(d) Notice to school districts of errors, if found, and the resolution determined to
be available; and
(e) Notice to the claimant relative to the validation review and the resolution
Page 27 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
determined to be available if the claim of error was validated.
Section 16. KRS 156.439 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate by administrative regulations
the method for calculating and distributing a district's [textbook and ]instructional
materials allocation. The district's allocation shall be used by schools to purchase:
(a) Instructional materials[Textbooks] and programs from the state
approved[recommended] list;
(b) Instructional materials[Textbooks] and programs not on the state's
approved[recommended] list, if notification is submitted to the Department of
Education that the material meets the selection criteria of the State
Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission] in KRS
156.405(3)(b), the subject specific criteria of the [textbook ]reviewers
pursuant to KRS 156.407(5), and compliance with the required publisher
specifications;
(c) Instructional materials, with an approved plan pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section; or
(d) Any combination of the above.
(2) The district shall identify all purchases made with the [textbook and ]instructional
materials allocation and shall keep on file a plan developed by each school, in
accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of
Education, for providing the necessary [textbooks and ]instructional materials for
all grades, and subject areas, including the replacement of books and materials
during the six (6) year adoption period. A school may carry forward to the next
school year any part of its [textbook and ]instructional materials allocation which
has been distributed to the district. If a local board does not approve a school
council's plan, the council may appeal to the commissioner and an administrative
hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Page 28 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
Section 17. KRS 156.440 is amended to read as follows:
Publishers and developers, upon the request of the superintendents of the county and
independent school districts, shall furnish to the local boards of education the requested
sample copies of their materials that were selected and placed on the state multiple list of
instructional materials[recommended textbooks] by the State Instructional Materials
Council[Textbook Commission].
Section 18. KRS 156.445 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] instructional materials collection[textbook or program] shall not be used in
any public school in Kentucky as a basal instructional material[title] unless it has
been [recommended and ]listed on the state multiple list by the State Instructional
Materials Council after approval by the board[Textbook Commission] or unless a
school and district has met the notification requirements under subsection (2) of this
section. Any changes of instructional materials[textbooks] made by the State
Instructional Materials Council[Textbook Commission] shall not become effective
until grades and classes of the respective county and independent school districts
have completed work for which the adopted instructional materials[book] then in
use was originally intended. Nothing in this section shall apply to the
supplementary instructional materials[books] that are needed from time to time.
(2) A superintendent[school council, or if none exists, the principal,] may notify[,
through the superintendent,] the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook
Commission] that the district[it] plans to adopt a basal instructional materials
collection[textbook or program] that is not on the approved[recommended] list by
submitting evidence that the instructional materials collection[title] it has chosen
meets the selection criteria of the State Instructional Materials Council[Textbook
Commission] in KRS 156.405(3)(b) and the subject specific criteria of the
[textbook ]reviewers pursuant to KRS 156.407(5) and complies with the required
[publisher ]specifications.
Page 29 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
(3) In approving instructional[text] materials for private and parochial schools for the
purpose of KRS 156.160(3) the [text ]materials shall be approved if they are
comprehensive and appropriate to the grade level in question notwithstanding the
fact that they may contain elements of religious philosophy.
Section 19. KRS 156.460 is amended to read as follows:
A[No] superintendent, teacher, or other official or employee of any institution supported
wholly or in part by public funds shall not act, directly or indirectly, as agent for any
person whose instructional materials[school textbooks] are filed with the commissioner
of education[chief state school officer].
Section 20. KRS 156.465 is amended to read as follows:
No person shall secure or attempt to secure the adoption of any instructional
materials[school textbook] in any school district in this state, by rewarding or promising
to reward, directly or indirectly, any person in any public school district in the state.
A[No] person shall not offer or give any emolument to any person in any school district
in this state for any vote or promise to vote, or the use of his influence, for any
instructional materials[school textbook] to be used in this state.
Section 21. KRS 156.470 is amended to read as follows:
A copy of all instructional materials[recommended titles] listed by the Kentucky Board
of Education[State Textbook Commission] shall remain in an office specified by the
commissioner of education[chief state school officer] as an official sample for the period
of the adoption.
Section 22. KRS 156.476 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the commissioner
of education[chief state school officer], shall select suitable instructional materials
collections[textbooks and programs] in an appropriate format, which include braille
textbooks, and other materials available in clear type of eighteen (18) to twenty-
four (24) points in the different subject areas for children with impaired vision who
Page 30 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
are attending the public schools of the Commonwealth of Kentucky in grades
kindergarten through twelve (12). These books and materials shall not be subject to
the official bids, filing fees, sampling, and the stipulated list prices, lowest
wholesale prices, and the standards and specifications required for the books and
materials approved and listed by the State Instructional Materials
Council[Textbook Commission] for regular use by the pupils attending the public
schools of the State of Kentucky. The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the
recommendation of the commissioner of education[chief state school officer], may
promulgate an administrative regulation determining the pupils eligible for the
books and materials, the number of books and types of materials to be purchased,
and the general administration of the program. The commissioner of
education[chief state school officer], subject to the approval of the Kentucky Board
of Education, may purchase these books and materials and distribute them without
cost to the pupils with impaired vision attending the public schools of the state. All
instructional materials[books and programs] purchased under this section for the
pupils with impaired vision are the property of the state.
(2) The Department of Education shall require any publisher or developer of an
instructional materials collection[a textbook or program] adopted for use in the
public schools of the Commonwealth to furnish the American Printing House for
the Blind with [computer diskettes or tapes of ]those [print ]materials [either in the
American Standard Code for Information Interchange, (ASCII), or ]in any [other]
format, either electronic or print, which can be readily translated into braille or
large print.
Section 23. KRS 158.6452 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council is hereby created to
study, review, and make recommendations concerning Kentucky's system of setting
academic standards, assessing learning, identifying academic competencies and
Page 31 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
deficiencies of individual students, holding schools accountable for learning, and
assisting schools to improve their performance. The council shall advise the
Kentucky Board of Education and the Legislative Research Commission on issues
related to the development and communication of the academic expectations and
core content for assessment, the development and implementation of the statewide
assessment and accountability program, recognition of high performing schools,
imposition of sanctions, and assistance for schools to improve their performance
under KRS 158.6453, 158.6455, 158.782, and 158.805.
(2) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall be
composed of seventeen (17) voting members, sixteen (16) of which are appointed
by the Governor and one being the commissioner of education.[ On making
appointments to the council, the Governor shall assure broad geographical
representation and representation of elementary, middle, and secondary school
levels; assure equal representation of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible; and
assure that appointments reflect the minority racial composition of the
Commonwealth.] The members shall serve terms of two (2) years with no member
serving more than two (2) consecutive terms, except that seven (7) of the initial
appointments shall be for four (4) year terms. The sixteen (16) appointed members
shall be appointed as follows:
(a) [Two (2) parents from recommendations submitted by organizations
representing school councils and parents;
(b) Two (2) teachers from recommendations submitted by organizations
representing teachers;
(c) Two (2) superintendents from recommendations submitted by organizations
representing superintendents;
(d) Two (2) principals from organizations representing school administrators;
(e) Two (2) local school board members from recommendations submitted by
Page 32 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
organizations representing school boards;
(f) ]Two (2) school district assessment coordinators from recommendations
submitted by organizations representing district assessment coordinators;
[(g) Two (2) employers in the state from recommendations submitted by
organizations representing business and industry;]
(b)[(h)] Six (6)[Two (2)] university professors with expertise in assessment and
measurement;[ and]
(c) Four (4) individuals who have recognized expertise in the setting of state
academic standards; and
(d) Four (4) individuals who have recognized expertise in the development of
instructional materials and curriculum aligned to state academic
standards[(i) One (1) at-large member].
(3) The commissioner of education shall serve as the chair of the School Curriculum,
Assessment, and Accountability Council[ shall elect a chair annually from its
membership].
(4) Except for the commissioner of education, the members shall be remunerated for
actual and necessary expenses incurred while attending meetings of the council or
while serving as representative of the council.
(5) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall meet at least
four (4) times each year at times and places as it determines by resolution.
(6) The School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall be attached
to the Department of Education for administrative purposes. It shall be provided
appropriate staff and resources to conduct its work.
(7) By June 30 and December 31 each year, the commissioner of education shall file
a report with the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate
Interim Joint Committee on Education. The report shall set out the current
membership of the council, any vacancies that have occurred since the last report
Page 33 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
filing, how long the vacancy existed or has existed, any reasoning for the failure
to fill the vacancy, the number and date of meetings held since the last report, the
time of day each meeting was held and the length of the meeting, and the
attendance or absence of each member of the council at each meeting.
Section 24. KRS 158.6453 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Accelerated learning" means an organized way of helping students meet
individual academic goals by providing direct instruction to eliminate student
performance deficiencies or enable students to move more quickly through
course requirements and pursue higher level skill development;
(b) "Constructed-response items" or "performance-based items" means individual
test items that require the student to create an answer rather than select a
response and may include fill-in-the-blank, short-answer, extended-answer,
open-response, and writing-on-demand formats;
(c) "Criterion-referenced test" means a test that is aligned with defined academic
content standards and measures an individual student's level of performance
against the standards;
(d) ["End-of-course examination" means the same as defined in KRS 158.860;
(e) ]"Formative assessment" means a process used by teachers and students
during instruction to adjust ongoing teaching and learning to improve
students' achievement of intended instructional outcomes. Formative
assessments may include the use of commercial assessments, classroom
observations, teacher-designed classroom tests and assessments, and other
processes and assignments to gain information about individual student
learning;
(e)[(f)] "Interim assessments" means assessments that are given periodically
throughout the year to provide diagnostic information and to show individual
Page 34 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
student performance against content standards;
(f)[(g)] "Summative assessment" means an assessment given at the end of the
school year, semester, or other period of time to evaluate students'
performance against content standards within a unit of instruction or a course;
and
(g)[(h)] "Writing" means a purposeful act of thinking and expression that uses
language to explore ideas and communicate meaning to others. Writing is a
complex, multifaceted act of communication and is distinct from basic
handwriting or penmanship.
(2) (a) [Beginning in fiscal year 2017-2018, and ]Every six (6) years[ thereafter], the
Kentucky Department of Education, through the School Curriculum,
Assessment, and Accountability Council, shall implement a process for
reviewing Kentucky's academic standards and the alignment of corresponding
assessments for possible revision or replacement to ensure alignment with
transition readiness standards necessary for global competitiveness, state
career and technical education standards, and KRS 158.196.
1. The council shall also advise the department in creating the guide for
educators, including aligned curriculum and instructional plans, as
required under Section 3 of this Act. As necessary or appropriate
based on changes to subject matter or state law, the department,
through the School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability
Council, may elect to review the academic standards and the
alignment of corresponding assessments and curriculum more
frequently than every six (6) years.
2. Notwithstanding the six (6) year review timeline in this paragraph, the
School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council shall
coordinate with the School Instructional Materials Council and the
Page 35 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
Kentucky Board of Education to ensure grade-appropriate and
updated academic standards are available for consideration to permit
compliance with the timelines established in subsection (6)(b) of
Section 2 of this Act.
(b) The revisions to the content standards shall:
1. Focus on critical knowledge, skills, and capacities needed for success in
the global economy;
2. Result in fewer but more in-depth standards to facilitate mastery
learning;
3. Communicate expectations more clearly and concisely to teachers,
parents, students, and citizens;
4. Be based on evidence-based research;
5. Consider international benchmarks; and
6. Ensure that the standards are aligned from elementary to high school to
postsecondary education so that students can be successful at each
education level.
(c) 1. The department shall establish four (4) standards and assessments
review committees, with each committee composed of a minimum of six
(6) Kentucky public school teachers and a minimum of two (2)
representatives from Kentucky institutions of higher education,
including at least one (1) representative from a public institution of
higher education. Each committee member shall teach in the subject
area that his or her committee is assigned to review and have no prior or
current affiliation with a curriculum or assessment resources vendor.
2. One (1) of the four (4) committees shall be assigned to focus on the
review of language arts and writing academic standards and
assessments, one (1) on the review of mathematics academic standards
Page 36 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
and assessments, one (1) on the review of science academic standards
and assessments, and one (1) on the review of social studies academic
standards and assessments.
(d) 1. The department shall establish twelve (12) advisory panels to advise and
assist each of the four (4) standards and assessments review committees.
2. Three (3) advisory panels shall be assigned to each standards and
assessments review committee. One (1) panel shall review the standards
and assessments for kindergarten through grade five (5), one (1) shall
review the standards and assessments for grades six (6) through eight
(8), and one (1) shall review the standards and assessments for grades
nine (9) through twelve (12).
3. Each advisory panel shall be composed of at least one (1) representative
from a Kentucky institution of higher education and a minimum of six
(6) Kentucky public school teachers who teach in the grade level and
subject reviewed by the advisory panel to which they are assigned and
have no prior or current affiliation with a curriculum or assessment
resources vendor.
(e) The commissioner of education and the president of the Council on
Postsecondary Education shall also provide consultants for the standards and
assessments review committees and the advisory panels who are business and
industry professionals actively engaged in career fields that depend on the
various content areas.
(f) 1. The standards and assessments process review committee is hereby
established and shall be composed of the commissioner of education or
designee as a nonvoting member and nine (9) voting representatives of
public schools, of whom at least two (2) shall be parents of public
school students, appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate
Page 37 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
in accordance with KRS 11.160 as follows:
a. One (1) language arts teacher;
b. One (1) math teacher;
c. One (1) science teacher;
d. One (1) social studies teacher;
e. Two (2) school principals;
f. Two (2) school superintendents; and
g. One (1) school board member.
2. On making appointments to the committee, the Governor shall ensure
broad geographical urban and rural representation and representation of
elementary, middle, and high school levels; ensure equal representation
of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible; and ensure that appointments
reflect the minority racial composition of the Commonwealth.
3. The review of the committee shall be limited to the procedural aspects
of the review process undertaken prior to its consideration.
4. Notwithstanding KRS 12.028, the committee shall not be subject to
reorganization by the Governor.
(g) 1. The review process implemented under this subsection shall be an open,
transparent process that allows all Kentuckians an opportunity to
participate. The department shall ensure the public's assistance in
reviewing and suggesting changes to the standards and alignment
adjustments to corresponding state assessments by establishing a
website dedicated to collecting comments by the public and educators.
An independent third party, which has no prior or current affiliation with
a curriculum or assessment resources vendor, shall be selected by the
department to collect and transmit the comments to the department for
dissemination to the appropriate advisory panel for review and
Page 38 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
consideration.
2. Each advisory panel shall review the standards and assessments for its
assigned subject matter and grade level and the suggestions made by the
public and educators. After completing its review, each advisory panel
shall make recommendations for changes to the standards and alignment
adjustments for assessments to the appropriate standards and
assessments review committee.
3. Each standards and assessments review committee shall review the
findings and make recommendations to revise or replace existing
standards and to adjust alignment of assessments.
4. The recommendations shall be published on the website established in
this subsection for the purpose of gathering additional feedback from the
public. The commissioner shall subsequently present the
recommendations and the public feedback to the Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
5. The commissioner shall subsequently provide a report to the standards
and assessments process review committee summarizing the process
conducted under this subsection and the resulting recommendations. The
report shall include but not be limited to the timeline of the review
process, public feedback, and responses from the Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
6. After receiving the commissioner's report, the standards and assessments
process review committee shall either concur that stakeholders have had
adequate opportunity to provide input on standards and the
corresponding alignment of state assessments or find the input process
deficient. If the process is found deficient, the recommendations may be
returned to the appropriate standards and assessments review committee
Page 39 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
for review as described in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph. If the
process is found sufficient, the recommendations shall be forwarded
without amendment to the Kentucky Board of Education.
(h) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A as may be needed for the administration
of the review process, including staggering the timing and sequence of the
review process by subject area and remuneration of the review committees
and advisory panels described in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection.
(i) 1. The Kentucky Board of Education, after receiving recommendations
from the School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council,
shall consider for approval the revisions to academic standards for a
content area and the alignment of the corresponding state assessment
once recommendations are received from the standards and assessments
process review committee. Existing state academic standards shall
remain in place until the board approves new standards.
2. Any revision to, or replacement of, the academic standards and
assessments as a result of the review process conducted under this
subsection shall be implemented in Kentucky public schools no later
than the second academic year following the review process. Existing
academic standards shall be used until new standards are implemented.
3. The Department of Education shall disseminate the academic content
standards to the schools and teacher preparation programs.
(j) The Department of Education shall provide or facilitate statewide training
sessions for existing teachers and administrators on how to:
1. Integrate the revised content standards into classroom instruction;
2. Better integrate performance assessment of students within their
instructional practices; and
Page 40 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
3. Help all students use higher-order thinking and communication skills.
(k) The Education Professional Standards Board in cooperation with the
Kentucky Board of Education and the Council on Postsecondary Education
shall coordinate information and training sessions for faculty and staff in all of
the teacher preparation programs, and for all school districts, in the use of the
revised academic content standards. The Education Professional Standards
Board shall ensure that each teacher preparation program includes use of the
academic standards in the pre-service education programs and that all teacher
interns will have experience planning classroom instruction based on the
revised standards.
(l) The Council on Postsecondary Education in cooperation with the Kentucky
Department of Education and the postsecondary education institutions in the
state shall coordinate information sessions regarding the academic content
standards for faculty who teach in the various content areas.
(m) The Education Professional Standards Board shall, as a condition of
program approval, require teacher preparation programs to align
curriculum with the expectations set forth in the state's academic content
standards.
(3) (a) The Kentucky Board of Education shall be responsible for creating and
implementing a balanced statewide assessment program that measures the
students', schools', and districts' achievement of the goals set forth in KRS
158.645 and 158.6451, to ensure compliance with the federal Every Student
Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor, and to ensure
school accountability.
(b) The board shall revise the annual statewide assessment program as needed in
accordance with revised academic standards and corresponding assessment
alignment adjustments approved by the board under subsection (2) of this
Page 41 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
section.
(c) The statewide assessments shall not include any academic standards not
approved by the board under subsection (2) of this section.
(d) The board shall seek the advice of the Office of Education Accountability; the
School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council; the Education
Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee, and the department's
technical advisory committee in the development of the assessment program.
The statewide assessment program shall not include measurement of a
student's ability to become a self-sufficient individual or to become a
responsible member of a family, work group, or community.
(4) (a) The academic components of the statewide assessment program shall be
composed of annual student summative tests, which may include a
combination of multiple competency-based assessment and performance
measures approved by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(b) The annual student summative tests shall:
1. Measure individual student achievement in language, reading, English,
mathematics, science, and social studies at designated grades;
2. Provide teachers and parents a valid and reliable comprehensive analysis
of skills mastered by individual students;
3. Provide diagnostic information that identifies strengths and academic
deficiencies of individual students in the content areas;
4. Provide information to teachers that can enable them to improve
instruction for current and future students;
5. Provide longitudinal profiles for students; and
6. Ensure school and district accountability for student achievement of the
goals set forth in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451, except the statewide
assessment program shall not include measurement of a student's ability
Page 42 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
to become a self-sufficient individual or to become a responsible
member of a family, work group, or community.
(5) The state student assessments shall include the following components:
(a) Elementary and middle grades requirements are:
1. A criterion-referenced test each in mathematics and reading in grades
three (3) through eight (8) that is valid and reliable for an individual
student and that measures the depth and breadth of Kentucky's academic
content standards;
2. A criterion-referenced test each in science and social studies that is valid
and reliable for an individual student as necessary to measure the depth
and breadth of Kentucky's academic content standards to be
administered one (1) time within the elementary and middle grades,
respectively;
3. An on-demand assessment of student writing to be administered one (1)
time within the elementary grades and one (1) time within the middle
grades; and
4. An editing and mechanics test relating to writing, using multiple choice
and constructed response items, to be administered one (1) time within
the elementary and the middle grades, respectively;
(b) High school requirements are:
1. A criterion-referenced test in mathematics, reading, and science that is
valid and reliable for an individual student and that measures the depth
and breadth of Kentucky's academic content standards to be
administered one (1) time within the high school grades;
2. A criterion-referenced test in social studies that is valid and reliable for
an individual student as necessary to measure the depth and breadth of
Kentucky's academic content standards to be administered one (1) time
Page 43 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
within the high school grades;
3. An on-demand assessment of student writing to be administered one (1)
time within the high school grades;
4. An editing and mechanics test relating to writing, using multiple choice
and constructed response items, to be administered one (1) time within
the high school grades; and
5. A college admissions examination to assess English, reading,
mathematics, and science in the spring of grade eleven (11);
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall add any other component necessary
to comply with the Every Student Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95,
or its successor, as determined by the United States Department of Education;
(d) The criterion-referenced components required in this subsection shall be
composed of constructed response items and multiple choice items; and
(e) [The Kentucky Board of Education may incorporate end-of-course
examinations into the assessment program to be used in lieu of requirements
for criterion-referenced tests required under paragraph (b) of this subsection;
and
(f) ]The results of the assessment program developed under this subsection shall
be used by schools and districts to determine appropriate instructional
modifications for all students in order for students to make continuous
progress, including that needed by advanced learners.
(6) Each school district shall administer the statewide student assessment during the
last fourteen (14) days of school in the district's instructional calendar. The
Kentucky Board of Education may change the testing window to allow for
innovative assessment systems or other online test administration and shall
promulgate administrative regulations that minimize the number of days of testing
and outline the procedures to be used during the testing process to ensure test
Page 44 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
security, including procedures for testing makeup days, and to comply with federal
assessment requirements.
(7) A student enrolled in a district-operated or district-contracted alternative program
shall participate in the appropriate assessments required by this section.
(8) A local school district may select and use commercial interim or formative
assessments or develop and use its own formative assessments to provide data on
how well its students are growing toward mastery of Kentucky academic standards,
so long as the district's local school board develops a policy minimizing the
reduction in instructional time related to the administration of the interim
assessments. Nothing in this section precludes teachers from using ongoing teacher-
developed formative processes.
(9) Each school that enrolls primary students shall use diagnostic assessments and
prompts that measure readiness in reading and mathematics for its primary students
as determined by the school to be developmentally appropriate. The schools may
use commercial products, use products and procedures developed by the district, or
develop their own diagnostic procedures. The results shall be used to inform the
teachers and parents or guardians of each student's skill level.
(10) The state board shall ensure that a technically sound longitudinal comparison of the
assessment results for the same students shall be made available.
(11) The following provisions shall apply to the college admissions examination
described in subsection (5)(b)5. of this section:
(a) The cost of the college admissions examination administered to students in
high school shall be paid for by the Kentucky Department of Education. The
costs of additional college admissions examinations shall be the responsibility
of the student;
(b) If funds are available, the Kentucky Department of Education shall provide a
college admissions examination preparation program to all public high school
Page 45 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
juniors. The department may contract for necessary services; and
(c) Accommodations provided to a student with a disability taking the college
admissions assessment under this subsection shall consist of:
1. Accommodations provided in a manner allowed by the college
admissions assessment provider when results in test scores are
reportable to a postsecondary institution for admissions and placement
purposes, except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph; or
2. Accommodations provided in a manner allowed by a student's
individualized education program as defined in KRS 158.281 for a
student whose disability precludes valid assessment of his or her
academic abilities using the accommodations provided under
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph when the student's scores are not
reportable to a postsecondary institution for admissions and placement
purposes.
(12) Kentucky teachers shall have a significant role in providing feedback about the
design of the assessments, except for the college admissions exam described in
subsection (5)(b)5. of this section. The assessments shall be designed to:
(a) Measure grade appropriate core academic content, basic skills, and higher-
order thinking skills and their application;
(b) Provide valid and reliable scores for schools. If scores are reported for
students individually, they shall be valid and reliable;
(c) Minimize the time spent by teachers and students on assessment; and
(d) Assess Kentucky academic standards only.
(13) The results from assessment under subsections (3) and (5) of this section shall be
reported to the school districts and schools no later than seventy-five (75) days
following the last day the assessment can be administered. Assessment reports
provided to the school districts and schools shall include an electronic copy of an
Page 46 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
operational subset of test items from each assessment administered to their students
and the results for each of those test items by student and by school.
(14) The Department of Education shall gather information to establish the validity of
the assessment and accountability program. It shall develop a biennial plan for
validation studies that shall include but not be limited to the consistency of student
results across multiple measures, the congruence of school scores with documented
improvements in instructional practice and the school learning environment, and the
potential for all scores to yield fair, consistent, and accurate student performance
level and school accountability decisions. Validation activities shall take place in a
timely manner and shall include a review of the accuracy of scores assigned to
students and schools, as well as of the testing materials. The plan shall be submitted
to the Commission by July 1 of the first year of each biennium. A summary of the
findings shall be submitted to the Legislative Research Commission by September
1 of the second year of the biennium.
(15) The Department of Education and the state board shall offer optional assistance to
local school districts and schools in developing and using continuous assessment
strategies needed to ensure student progress. The continuous assessment shall
provide diagnostic information to improve instruction to meet the needs of
individual students.
(16) The Administration Code for Kentucky's Assessment Program shall include
prohibitions of inappropriate test preparation activities by school district employees
charged with test administration and oversight, including but not limited to the issue
of teachers being required to do test practice in lieu of regular classroom instruction
and test practice outside the normal work day. The code shall include disciplinary
sanctions that may be taken toward a school or individuals.
(17) The Kentucky Board of Education, after the Department of Education has received
advice from the Office of Education Accountability; the School Curriculum,
Page 47 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
Assessment, and Accountability Council; and the department's technical advisory
committee, shall promulgate an administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A
to establish the components of a reporting structure for assessments administered
under this section. The reporting structure shall include the following components:
(a) A school report card that clearly communicates with parents and the public
about school performance. The school report card shall be sent to the parents
of the students of the districts, and information on electronic access to a
summary of the results for the district shall be published in the newspaper
with the largest circulation in the county. It shall include but not be limited to
the following components reported by race, gender, and disability when
appropriate:
1. Student academic achievement, including the results from each of the
assessments administered under this section;
2. For Advanced Placement, Cambridge Advanced International, and
International Baccalaureate, the courses offered, the number of students
enrolled, completing, and taking the examination for each course, and
the percentage of examinees receiving a score of three (3) or better on
AP examinations, a score of "e" or better on Cambridge Advanced
International examinations, or a score of four (4) or better on IB
examinations. The data shall be disaggregated by gender, race, students
with disabilities, and economic status;
3. Nonacademic achievement, including the school's attendance, retention,
graduation rates, and student transition to postsecondary;
4. School learning environment, including measures of parental
involvement; and
5. Any other school performance data required by the Every Student
Succeeds Act of 2015, Pub. L. No. 114-95, or its successor;
Page 48 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
(b) An individual student report to parents for each student in grades three (3)
through eight (8) summarizing the student's skills in reading, science, social
studies, and mathematics. The school's staff shall develop a plan for
accelerated learning for any student with identified deficiencies or strengths;
and
(c) A student's score on the college admissions assessment administered under
subsection (5)(b)5. of this section.
(18) (a) [Beginning in fiscal year 2017-2018, and ]Every six (6) years[ thereafter], the
Kentucky Department of Education, after receiving recommendations from
the School Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council, shall
implement a comprehensive process for reviewing and revising the academic
standards in visual and performing arts and practical living skills and career
studies for all levels and in foreign language for middle and high schools. The
department shall develop review committees for the standards for each of the
content areas that include representation from certified specialist public
school teachers and postsecondary teachers in those subject areas.
(b) The academic standards in practical living skills for elementary, middle, and
high school levels shall include a focus on drug abuse prevention, with an
emphasis on the prescription drug epidemic and the connection between
prescription opioid abuse and addiction to other drugs, such as heroin and
synthetic drugs.
(c) The department shall provide to all schools guidelines for programs that
incorporate the adopted academic standards in visual and performing arts and
practical living and career studies. The department shall provide to middle and
high schools guidelines for including a foreign language program. The
guidelines shall address program length and time, courses offered, staffing,
resources, and facilities.
Page 49 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
(d) The Kentucky Department of Education, in consultation with the School
Curriculum, Assessment, and Accountability Council and certified public
school teachers of visual and performing arts, may develop program standards
for the visual and performing arts.
(19) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide to all school districts
guidelines for including an effective writing program within the curriculum.
(20) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education, in consultation with the review
committees described in subsection (18) of this section, shall develop a school
profile report to be used by all schools to document how they will address the
adopted academic standards in their implementation of the programs as
described in subsection (18) of this section, which may include student
opportunities and experiences in extracurricular activities. The department
shall include the essential workplace ethics program on the school profile
report.
(b) By October 1 of each year, each school principal shall complete the school
profile report, which shall be signed by the members of the school council, or
the principal if no school council exists, and the superintendent. The report
shall be electronically transmitted to the Kentucky Department of Education,
and the original shall be maintained on file at the local board office and made
available to the public upon request. The department shall include a link to
each school's profile report on its website.
(c) If a school staff member, student, or a student's parent has concerns regarding
deficiencies in a school's implementation of the programs described in
subsection (18) of this section, he or she may submit a written inquiry to the
school council.
Section 25. KRS 7.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide an efficient system of common
Page 50 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
schools which shall be operated without waste, duplication, mismanagement, and
political influence. The system of schools shall have the goal of creating and
system consistent with the goals stated in Section 1 of this Act and providing all
students with at least the seven (7) capacities referred to in KRS 158.645.
(2) (a) An Office of Education Accountability is hereby created and shall be under
the direction of the Legislative Research Commission and shall be advised
and monitored by the Education Assessment and Accountability Review
Subcommittee.
(b) The Office of Education Accountability shall be administered by a deputy
director appointed by the Legislative Research Commission upon
recommendation of the director of the Legislative Research Commission. The
deputy director shall have the qualifications set by the Commission. The
salary of the deputy director shall be set by the Commission. The Commission
shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the employment of personnel necessary
to carry out the provisions of this section. The deputy director shall be subject
to the direction of and report to the director of the Legislative Research
Commission.
(c) The Office of Education Accountability shall have the following duties and
responsibilities:
1. Monitor the elementary and secondary public education system,
including actions taken and reports issued by the Kentucky Board of
Education, the Education Professional Standards Board, the
commissioner of education, the Department of Education, and local
school districts. Upon and under the direction of the Education
Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee, the monitoring
of the elementary and secondary public education system shall also
include periodic reviews of local district and school-based decision
Page 51 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
making policies relating to the recruitment, interviewing, selection,
evaluation, termination, or promotion of personnel. The office shall
report any district or school when evidence demonstrates a pattern of
exclusionary personnel practices relating to race or sex to the Kentucky
Department of Education, which shall then independently investigate
facts raised in or associated with the report. The results of the
investigation conducted by the department shall be forwarded to the
Kentucky Board of Education which shall conduct an investigative
hearing on the matter.
2. Upon and under the direction of the Education Assessment and
Accountability Review Subcommittee, review the elementary and
secondary public education finance system. The review shall include an
analysis of the level of equity achieved by the funding system and
whether adequate funds are available to all school districts and an
analysis of the weights of various education program components
developed by the Department of Education. The review may also
include recommendations for the base per pupil funding for the Support
Education Excellence in Kentucky Program and a statewide salary
schedule, and studies of other finance issues identified by the Education
Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee.
3. Upon and under the direction of the Education Assessment and
Accountability Review Subcommittee, verify the accuracy of reports of
school, district, and state performance by conducting, requesting, or
upon approval of the Legislative Research Commission, contracting for
periodic program and fiscal audits. Upon and under the direction of the
Education Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee, the
Office of Education Accountability shall monitor and verify the
Page 52 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
accuracy of reports of the Department of Education and the Kentucky
Board of Education, including but not limited to the annual fiscal
conditions of grants, categorical programs, and other educational
initiatives set forth by the General Assembly.
4. Investigate allegations of wrongdoing of any person or agency,
including but not limited to waste, duplication, mismanagement,
political influence, and illegal activity at the state, regional, or school
district level; make appropriate referrals to other agencies with
jurisdiction over those allegations; and make recommendations for
legislative action to the Education Assessment and Accountability
Review Subcommittee. Upon acceptance by the subcommittee,
recommendations for legislative action shall be forwarded to the
Legislative Research Commission. The Office of Education
Accountability shall submit to the subcommittee, for each of its regular
meetings, a report that summarizes investigative activity initiated
pursuant to this subparagraph. The subcommittee may consider each
report as it determines and in its discretion. Each report, and the
consideration thereof by the subcommittee, shall be exempt from the
open records and open meetings requirements contained in KRS Chapter
61.
5. Upon and under the direction of the Education Assessment and
Accountability Review Subcommittee, conduct studies, analyze, verify,
and validate the state assessment program through other external
indicators of academic progress including but not limited to American
College Test scores, Scholastic Assessment Test scores, National
Assessment of Educational Progress scores, Preliminary Scholastic
Assessment Test scores, Advanced Placement Program participation,
Page 53 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
standardized test scores, college remediation rates, retention and
attendance rates, dropout rates, and additional available data on the
efficiency of the system of schools and whether progress is being made
toward attaining the goal of providing students with the seven (7)
capacities as required by KRS 158.645.
6. Make periodic reports to the Education Assessment and Accountability
Review Subcommittee as directed by the subcommittee. Upon
acceptance by the subcommittee, the reports shall be forwarded to the
Legislative Research Commission.
7. Make periodic reports to the Legislative Research Commission as may
be directed by the Commission.
8. Prepare an annual report, which shall consist of a summary of the status
and results of the current year annual research agenda provided in
paragraph (d) of this subsection, a summary of completed investigative
activity conducted pursuant to subparagraph 4. of this paragraph, and
other items of significance as determined by the Education Assessment
and Accountability Review Subcommittee. The annual report shall be
submitted to the Education Assessment and Accountability Review
Subcommittee. Upon acceptance by the subcommittee, the annual report
shall be submitted to the Governor, the Legislative Research
Commission, and the Kentucky Board of Education.
(d) On or before December 1 of each calendar year, the Education Assessment
and Accountability Review Subcommittee shall adopt the annual research
agenda for the Office of Education Accountability. The annual research
agenda may include studies, research, and investigations considered to be
significant by the Education Assessment and Accountability Review
Subcommittee. Staff of the Office of Education Accountability shall prepare a
Page 54 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
suggested list of study and research topics related to elementary and
secondary public education for consideration by the Education Assessment
and Accountability Review Subcommittee in the development of the annual
research agenda. An adopted annual research agenda shall be amended to
include any studies mandated by the next succeeding General Assembly for
completion by the Office of Education Accountability.
(e) The Office of Education Accountability shall have access to all public records
and information on oath as provided in KRS 7.110. The office shall also have
access to otherwise confidential records, meetings, and hearings regarding
local school district personnel matters. However, the office shall not disclose
any information contained in or derived from the records, meetings, and
hearings that would enable the discovery of the specific identification of any
individual who is the focus or subject of the personnel matter.
(f) In compliance with KRS 48.800, 48.950, and 48.955, the Finance and
Administration Cabinet and the Governor's Office for Policy and Management
shall provide to the Office of Education Accountability access to all
information and records, other than preliminary work papers, relating to
allotment of funds, whether by usual allotment or by other means, to the
Department of Education, local school districts, and to other recipients of
funds for educational purposes.
(g) Any state agency receiving a complaint or information which, if accurate,
may identify a violation of the Kentucky Education Reform Act of 1990, 1990
Ky. Acts ch. 476, shall notify the office of the complaint or information.
(h) The Office of Education Accountability may contract for services as approved
by the Legislative Research Commission pursuant to KRS 7.090(8).
(3) The provisions of KRS 61.878 or any other statute, including Acts of the 1992
Regular Session of the General Assembly to the contrary notwithstanding, the
Page 55 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
testimony of investigators, work products, and records of the Office of Education
Accountability relating to duties and responsibilities under subsection (2) of this
section shall be privileged and confidential during the course of an ongoing
investigation or until authorized, released, or otherwise made public by the Office
of Education Accountability and shall not be subject to discovery, disclosure, or
production upon the order or subpoena of a court or other agency with subpoena
power.
Section 26. KRS 157.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In determining the cost of the program to support education excellence in
Kentucky, the statewide guaranteed base funding level, as defined in KRS
157.320, shall be computed by dividing the amount appropriated for this
purpose by the prior year's statewide average daily attendance.
(b) When determining the biennial appropriations for the program, the average
daily attendance for each fiscal year shall include an estimate of the number
of students graduating early under the provisions of KRS 158.142.
(2) Each district shall receive an amount equal to the base funding level for each pupil
in average daily attendance in the district in the previous year, except a district shall
receive an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the state portion of the average
statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student who graduated
early under the provisions of KRS 158.142. Each district's base funding level shall
be adjusted by the following factors:
(a) The number of at-risk students in the district. At-risk students shall be
identified as those approved for the free lunch program under state and federal
guidelines. The number of at-risk students shall be multiplied by a factor to be
established by the General Assembly. Funds generated under this paragraph
may be used to pay for:
1. Alternative programs for students who are at risk of dropping out of
Page 56 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
school before achieving a diploma; and
2. A hazardous duty pay supplement as determined by the local board of
education to the teachers who work in alternative programs with
students who are violent or assaultive;
(b) The number and types of exceptional children in the district as defined by
KRS 157.200. Specific weights for each category of exceptionality shall be
used in the calculation of the add-on factor for exceptional children; and
(c) Transportation costs. The per-pupil cost of transportation shall be calculated
as provided by KRS 157.370. Districts which contract to furnish
transportation to students attending nonpublic schools may adopt any payment
formula which ensures that no public school funds are used for the
transportation of nonpublic students.
(3) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year and each year thereafter, the General
Assembly shall annually allocate funds equal to one-half (1/2) of the state portion
of the average statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student
who graduated early under the provisions of KRS 158.142 the previous school year
to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority for deposit in the early
graduation scholarship trust fund.
(4) The program to support education excellence in Kentucky shall be fully
implemented by the 1994-95 school year.
(5) (a) The commissioner of education shall enforce maximum class sizes in every
academic course requirement for kindergarten through grade one (1).
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the maximum number
of pupils enrolled in a class shall be as follows:
1. Twenty-four (24) in all academic content area classes; and
2. At the discretion of the district in vocal and instrumental music and
physical education classes.
Page 57 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
(b) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision
making, the commissioner of education shall enforce maximum class sizes for
every academic course requirement in [all ]grades two (2) through twelve (12)
except in vocal and instrumental music[,] and physical education classes.
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the maximum number of
pupils enrolled in a class shall be as follows:
1. Twenty-four (24) in grades two (2) and three (3)[primary grades
(kindergarten through third grade)];
2. Twenty-eight (28) in grade four (4);
3. Twenty-nine (29) in grades five (5) and six (6); and
4. Thirty-one (31) in grades seven (7) to twelve (12).
(c)[(b)] Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision
making, Class size loads for middle and secondary school classroom teachers
shall not exceed the equivalent of one hundred fifty (150) pupil hours per day.
(d)[(c)] The commissioner of education, upon approval of the Kentucky Board
of Education, shall adopt administrative regulations for enforcing this
provision. These administrative regulations shall include procedures for a
superintendent to request an exemption from the Kentucky Board of
Education when unusual circumstances warrant an increased class size for an
individual class. A request for an exemption shall include specific reasons for
the increased class size with a plan for reducing the class size prior to the
beginning of the next school year. A district shall not receive in any one (1)
year exemptions for more classes than enroll twenty percent (20%) of the
pupils in the primary grades and grades four (4) through eight (8).
(e)[(d)] In all schools the commissioner of education shall enforce the special
education maximum class sizes set by administrative regulations adopted by
the Kentucky Board of Education. A superintendent may request an
Page 58 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
exemption pursuant to paragraph (d)[(c)] of this subsection. A local school
council may request a waiver pursuant to KRS 156.160(2). An exemption or
waiver shall not be granted if the increased class size will impede any
exceptional child from achieving his or her individual education program in
the least restrictive environment.
(6) In grades four (4) through six (6) with combined grades, the maximum class size
shall be the average daily attendance upon which funding is appropriated for the
lowest assigned grade in the class. There shall be no exceptions to the maximum
class size for combined classes. In combined classes other than the primary grades,
no ungraded students shall be placed in a combined class with graded students. In
addition, there shall be no more than two (2) consecutive grade levels combined in
any one (1) class in grades four (4) through six (6). However, this shall not apply to
schools which have implemented school-based decision making.
(7) If a local school district, through its admission and release committee, determines
that an appropriate program in the least restrictive environment for a particular child
with a disability includes either part-time or full-time enrollment with a private
school or agency within the state or a public or private agency in another state, the
school district shall count as average daily attendance in a public school the time
that the child is in attendance at the school or agency, contingent upon approval by
the commissioner of education.
(8) Pupils attending a center for child learning and study established under an
agreement pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 shall, for the purpose of calculating
average daily attendance, be considered as in attendance in the school district in
which the child legally resides and which is party to the agreement. For purposes of
subsection (1) of this section, teachers who are actually employees of the joint or
cooperative action shall be considered as employees of each school district which is
a party to the agreement.
Page 59 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
(9) Program funding shall be increased when the average daily attendance in any
district for the first two (2) months of the current school year is greater than the
average daily attendance of the district for the first two (2) months of the previous
school year. The program funds allotted the district shall be increased by the
percent of increase. The average daily attendance in kindergarten is the
kindergarten full-time equivalent pupils in average daily attendance.
(10) If the average daily attendance for the current school year in any district decreases
by ten percent (10%) or more than the average daily attendance for the previous
school year, the average daily attendance for purposes of calculating program
funding for the next school year shall be increased by an amount equal to two-thirds
(2/3) of the decrease in average daily attendance. If the average daily attendance
remains the same or decreases in the succeeding school year, the average daily
attendance for purposes of calculating program funding for the following school
year shall be increased by an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the decrease for the
first year of the decline.
(11) If the percentage of attendance of any school district shall have been reduced more
than two percent (2%) during the previous school year, the program funding
allotted the district for the current school year shall be increased by the difference in
the percentage of attendance for the two (2) years immediately prior to the current
school year less two percent (2%).
(12) (a) Instructional salaries for vocational agriculture classes shall be for twelve (12)
months per year. Vocational agriculture teachers shall be responsible for the
following program of instruction during the time period beyond the regular
school term established by the local board of education: supervision and
instruction of students in agriculture experience programs; group and
individual instruction of farmers and agribusinessmen; supervision of student
members of agricultural organizations who are involved in leadership training
Page 60 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
or other activity required by state or federal law; or any program of vocational
agriculture established by the Department of Education. During extended
employment, no vocational agriculture teacher shall receive salary on a day
that the teacher is scheduled to attend an institution of higher education class
which could be credited toward meeting any certification requirement.
(b) Each teacher of agriculture employed shall submit an annual plan for summer
program to the local school superintendent for approval. The summer plan
shall include a list of tasks to be performed, purposes for each task, and time
to be spent on each task. Approval by the local school superintendent shall be
in compliance with the guidelines developed by the Department of Education.
The supervision and accountability of teachers of vocational agriculture's
summer programs shall be the responsibility of the local school
superintendent. The local school superintendent shall submit to the
commissioner of education a completed report of summer tasks for each
vocational agriculture teacher. Twenty percent (20%) of the approved
vocational agriculture programs shall be audited annually by the State
Department of Education to determine that the summer plan has been properly
executed.
(13) (a) In allotting program funds for home and hospital instruction, statewide
guaranteed base funding, excluding the capital outlay, shall be allotted for
each child in average daily attendance in the prior school year who has been
properly identified according to Kentucky Board of Education administrative
regulations. Attendance shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall
be reported monthly on forms provided by the Department of Education; and
(b) Pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education,
local school districts shall be reimbursed for home and hospital instruction for
pupils unable to attend regular school sessions because of short-term health
Page 61 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
impairments. A reimbursement formula shall be established by administrative
regulations to include such factors as a reasonable per hour, per child
allotment for teacher instructional time, with a maximum number of funded
hours per week, a reasonable allotment for teaching supplies and equipment,
and a reasonable allotment for travel expenses to and from instructional
assignments, but the formula shall not include an allotment for capital outlay.
Attendance shall be calculated pursuant to KRS 157.270 and shall be reported
annually on forms provided by the Department of Education.
(14) Except for those schools which have implemented school-based decision making
and the school council has voted to waive this subsection, kindergarten aides shall
be provided for each twenty-four (24) full-time equivalent kindergarten students
enrolled.
(15) Effective July 1, 2001, there shall be no deduction applied against the base funding
level for any pupil in average daily attendance who spends a portion of his or her
school day in a program at a state-operated career and technical education or
vocational facility.
(16) During a fiscal year, a school district may request that the Department of Education
recalculate its funds allocated under this section if the current year average daily
attendance for the twenty (20) day school month as defined in KRS 158.060(1) that
contains the most days within the calendar month of January exceeds the prior year
adjusted average daily attendance plus growth by at least one percent (1%). Any
adjustments in the allotments approved under this subsection shall be proportional
to the remaining days in the school year and subject to available funds under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
(17) To calculate the state portion of the program to support education excellence in
Kentucky for a school district, the Department of Education shall subtract the local
effort required under KRS 157.390(5) from the calculated base funding under the
Page 62 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
program to support education excellence in Kentucky, as required by this section.
The value of the real estate used in this calculation shall be the lesser of the current
year assessment or the prior year assessment increased by four percent (4%) plus
the value of current year new property. The calculation under this subsection shall
be subject to available funds.
(18) Notwithstanding any other statute or budget of the Commonwealth language to the
contrary, time missed due to shortening days for emergencies may be made up by
lengthening school days in the school calendar without any loss of funds under the
program to support education excellence in Kentucky.
Section 27. KRS 157.195 is amended to read as follows:
The General Assembly declares that all students of the Commonwealth have a right to an
appropriate and quality education in the public schools and the right to achieve the
capacities and goals under KRS 158.645. The General Assembly challenges all school
personnel to take the necessary action to help each individual student complete
elementary and secondary school with the capacities to transition successfully to adult
life.
Section 28. KRS 158.6450 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby finds that knowledge of procedures for voter
registration and participation in elections is essential for all Kentucky students to
acquire the capacities established in subsections (2)(b) and (d) of Section 1 of this
Act[KRS 158.645(2) and (4)]. Instruction in election procedures is consistent with
the goals of responsible citizenship established in KRS 158.6451.
(2) Every secondary school shall provide students in the twelfth grade information on:
(a) How to register to vote;
(b) How to vote in an election using a ballot; and
(c) How to vote using an absentee ballot.
(3) A school may provide this information through classroom activities, written
Page 63 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 249
materials, electronic communication, internet resources, participation in mock
elections, and other methods identified by the principal after consulting with
teachers.
Page 64 of 64
XXXX 2/18/2025 1:14 PM Jacketed